Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-410
Licensure requirements; exemptions.

(1) An individual who accompanies an athletic team or organization from another state or jurisdiction as the athletic trainer is exempt from the licensure requirements of the Athletic Training Practice Act.

(2) An athletic training student who is enrolled in an athletic training education program accredited by an accrediting body approved by the board is exempt from the licensure requirements of the Athletic Training Practice Act.

Laws 1999, LB 178, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 66;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,239.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 182;

Laws 2022, LB436, § 9.